California statutes. Labor Code
(2) The division may, with or without receiving a complaint, commence investigating an employer, in accordance with this section, that it suspects to have discharged or otherwise discriminated against an individual in violation of any law under the jurisdiction of the Labor Commissioner. The division may proceed without a complaint in those instances where suspected retaliation has occurred during the course of adjudicating a wage claim pursuant to Section 98, or during a field inspection pursuant to Section 90.5, in accordance with this section, or in instances of suspected immigration-related threats in violation of Section 244, 1019, or 1019.1.

(b) (1) Each complaint of unlawful discharge or discrimination shall be assigned to a discrimination complaint investigator who shall prepare and submit a report to the Labor Commissioner based on an investigation of
 the complaint. The Labor Commissioner or
 the commissioner’s designee shall receive and review the reports. The investigation shall include, where appropriate, interviews with the complainant, respondent, and any witnesses who may have information concerning the alleged violation, and a review of any documents that may be relevant to the disposition of the complaint. The identity of a witness shall remain confidential unless the identification of the witness becomes necessary to proceed with the investigation or to prosecute an action to enforce a determination. The investigation report submitted to the Labor Commissioner or designee shall include the statements and documents obtained in the investigation, and the findings of the investigator concerning whether a violation occurred. The Labor Commissioner may hold an investigative hearing whenever the Labor Commissioner determines that a hearing is necessary to fully establish the facts. In the hearing the complainant and respondent shall have the opportunity
 to present evidence. The Labor Commissioner shall issue, serve, and enforce any necessary subpoenas. If a complainant files an action in court against an employer based on the same or similar facts as a complaint made under this section, the Labor Commissioner may, at the commissioner’s discretion, close the investigation. If a complainant has already challenged the complainant’s discipline or discharge through the State Personnel Board, or other internal governmental procedure, or through a collective bargaining agreement grievance procedure that incorporates antiretaliation provisions under this code, the
 Labor Commissioner may reject the complaint.

(2) (A) The Labor Commissioner, during the course of an investigation pursuant to this section, upon finding reasonable cause to believe that any person has engaged in or is engaging in a violation, may petition the superior court in any county in which the violation in question is alleged to have occurred or in which the person resides or transacts business, for appropriate temporary or preliminary injunctive relief, or both temporary and preliminary injunctive relief.

(B) Upon filing of a petition pursuant to this paragraph, the Labor Commissioner shall cause notice of the petition to be served on the person, and the court shall have jurisdiction to grant temporary injunctive relief as the court determines to be just and proper.

(C) In addition to
 any harm resulting directly to an individual from a violation of any law under the jurisdiction of the Labor Commissioner, the court shall consider the chilling effect on other employees asserting their rights under those laws in determining if temporary injunctive relief is just and proper.

(D) If an employee has been discharged or faced adverse action for raising a claim of retaliation for asserting rights under any law under the jurisdiction of the Labor Commissioner, a court shall order appropriate injunctive relief on a showing that reasonable cause exists to believe that an employee has been discharged or subjected to adverse action for raising a claim of retaliation or asserting rights under any law under the jurisdiction of the Labor Commissioner.

(E) The temporary injunctive relief shall remain in effect until the Labor Commissioner issues a determination or citations, or
 until the completion of review pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 98.74, whichever period is longer, or at a time certain set by the court. Afterwards, the court may issue a preliminary or permanent injunction if it is shown to be just and proper. Any temporary injunctive relief shall not prohibit an employer from disciplining or terminating an employee for conduct that is unrelated to the claim of the retaliation.

(F) Notwithstanding Section 916 of the Code of Civil Procedure, injunctive relief granted pursuant to this section shall not be stayed pending appeal.

(c) (1) If the Labor Commissioner determines a violation has occurred, the Labor Commissioner may issue a determination in accordance with this section or issue a citation in accordance with Section 98.74. If the Labor Commissioner issues a determination,
 the commissioner shall notify the complainant and respondent and direct the respondent to cease and desist from any violation and take any action deemed necessary to remedy the violation, including, where appropriate, rehiring or reinstatement, reimbursement of lost wages and interest thereon, payment of penalties, payment of reasonable attorney’s fees associated with any hearing held by the Labor Commissioner in investigating the complaint, and the posting of notices to employees. If the respondent does not comply with the order within 30 days following notification of the Labor Commissioner’s determination, the Labor Commissioner shall bring an action promptly in an appropriate court against the respondent. An action by the Labor Commissioner seeking injunctive relief, reimbursement of lost wages and interest thereon, payment of penalties, and any other appropriate relief, shall not accrue until a respondent fails to comply with the order for more than 30 days
 following notification of the commissioner’s determination. The Labor Commissioner shall commence an action within three years of its accrual, regardless of whether the commissioner seeks penalties in the action. If the Labor Commissioner fails to bring an action in court promptly, the complainant may bring an action against the Labor Commissioner in any appropriate court for a writ of mandate to compel the Labor Commissioner to bring an action in court against the respondent. If the complainant prevails in their action for a writ, the court shall award the complainant court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees, notwithstanding any other law. Regardless of any delay in bringing an action in court, the Labor Commissioner shall not be divested of jurisdiction. In any action, the court may permit the claimant to
 intervene as a party plaintiff to the action and shall have jurisdiction, for cause shown, to restrain the violation and to order all appropriate relief. Appropriate relief includes, but is not limited to, rehiring or reinstatement of the complainant, reimbursement of lost wages and interest thereon, and any other compensation or equitable relief as is appropriate under the circumstances of the case. The Labor Commissioner shall petition the court for appropriate temporary relief or a restraining order unless the commissioner determines good cause exists for not doing so.

(2) If the Labor Commissioner is a prevailing party in an enforcement
 action pursuant to this section, the court shall determine the reasonable attorney’s fees incurred by the Labor Commissioner in prosecuting the enforcement action and assess that amount as a cost upon the employer.

(3) An employer who willfully refuses to comply with an order of a court pursuant to this section to hire, promote, or otherwise restore an employee or former employee who has been determined to be eligible for such relief, or who refuses to comply with an order to post a notice to employees or otherwise cease and desist from the violation shall, in addition to any other penalties available, be subject to a penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each day the employer continues to be in noncompliance with the court order, up to a maximum of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000). Any penalty pursuant to this section shall be paid to the affected employee.

(d) (1) If the Labor Commissioner determines no violation has occurred,
 the commissioner
 shall notify the complainant and respondent and shall dismiss the complaint. The Labor Commissioner may direct the complainant to pay reasonable attorney’s fees associated with any hearing held by the Labor Commissioner if the Labor Commissioner finds the complaint was frivolous, unreasonable, groundless, and was brought in bad faith. The complainant may, after notification of the Labor Commissioner’s determination to dismiss a complaint, bring an action in an appropriate court, which shall have jurisdiction to determine whether a violation occurred, and if so, to restrain the violation and order all appropriate relief to remedy the violation. Appropriate relief includes, but is not limited to, rehiring or reinstatement of the complainant, reimbursement of lost wages and interest thereon, and other compensation or equitable relief as is appropriate under the circumstances of the case. When dismissing a complaint, the Labor Commissioner shall advise the complainant of
 their right to bring an action in an appropriate court if the complainant disagrees with the determination of the Labor Commissioner, and in the case of an alleged violation of Section 6310 or 6311, to file a complaint against the state program with the United States Department of Labor. Any time limitation for a complainant to bring an action in court shall be tolled from the time of filing the complaint with the division until the issuance of the Labor Commissioner’s determination.

(2) The filing of a timely complaint against the state program with the United States Department of Labor shall stay the Labor Commissioner’s dismissal of the division complaint until the United States Secretary of Labor makes a
 determination regarding the alleged violation. Within 15 days of receipt of that determination, the Labor Commissioner shall notify the parties whether the commissioner will reopen the complaint filed with the division or whether the dismissal will be reaffirmed.

(e) The Labor Commissioner shall notify the complainant and respondent of the
 commissioner’s determination under subdivision (c) or paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), not later than one year after the filing of the complaint. Determinations by the Labor Commissioner under subdivision (c) or (d) shall be final and not subject to administrative appeal except for cases arising under Sections 6310 and 6311, which may be appealed by the complainant to the Director of Industrial Relations pursuant to an appeal process, including time limitations, that is consistent with the mandates of the United States Department of Labor. The appeal from a determination for cases arising under Sections 6310 and 6311 shall set forth specifically and in full detail the grounds upon which the complainant considers the Labor Commissioner’s determination to be unjust or unlawful, and every issue to be considered by the director. The director may consider any issue relating to the initial determination and may modify, affirm, or reverse the Labor Commissioner’s determination. The
 director’s determination shall be the determination of the Labor Commissioner for cases arising under Sections 6310 and 6311 that are appealed to the director. The director shall notify the complainant and respondent of the director’s determination within 10 days of receipt of the appeal.

(f) The rights and remedies provided by this section do not preclude an employee from pursuing any other rights and remedies under any other law.

(g) In the enforcement of this section, there is no requirement that an individual exhaust administrative remedies or procedures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 344, Sec. 1.   (AB 1947)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

98.74.

(a) If the Labor Commissioner determines, after an investigation of a retaliation or discrimination complaint filed in accordance with Section 98.7, that a violation has occurred and the Labor Commissioner proceeds with a citation, the Labor Commissioner shall issue, with reasonable promptness, a citation to the person who has been determined to be responsible for the violation. The citation shall be in writing, shall describe the nature of the violation and the amount of wages and penalties due, and shall include any and all appropriate relief. Appropriate relief includes directing the person cited to cease and desist from the violation and take any action necessary to remedy the violation, including, where appropriate, rehiring or reinstatement, reimbursement
 of lost wages and interest thereon, and posting notices to employees. Service of the citation shall be completed pursuant to Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure by first-class and certified mail to the person cited. The citation shall advise the person cited of the procedure for obtaining review of the citation.

(b) (1) A person issued a citation pursuant to this section may obtain review of the citation by transmitting a written request for an informal hearing to the office of the Labor Commissioner at the address that appears on the citation within 30 days after service of the citation. If no hearing is requested within 30 days after service of the citation, the citation shall become final.

(2) The
 Labor Commissioner shall file, within 10 days of the citation becoming final pursuant to this section, a certified copy of the final citation with the clerk of the superior court in the county in which the person assessed has or had a place of business, accompanied by a declaration that all prerequisites for issuing a judgment have been met. Judgment in favor of the state and against the person being assessed shall be entered immediately by the court clerk in conformity therewith for the total monetary amount shown on the citation. The Labor Commissioner may also file a petition in superior court
 seeking an order to show cause why any injunctive and other nonmonetary relief determined by the Labor Commissioner or their designee in a citation that has become final should not be ordered. After filing the petition, the Labor Commissioner may file an application for an order to show cause and serve it upon the respondent. Promptly after the Labor Commissioner files the application for an order to show cause, the court shall issue an order to show cause why any injunctive and other nonmonetary relief should not be ordered and schedule a hearing. Absent a showing of an abuse of discretion, the court shall enter judgment for the state against the respondent for the injunctive and other nonmonetary relief.

(3) A person to whom a citation has been issued shall, in lieu of contesting a citation pursuant to this section, transmit, within 30 days after service of the citation, to the office of the Labor Commissioner designated on the citation, both the amount specified for the violation and a certification of compliance with any other remedies
 ordered.

(c) Upon receipt of a timely request, an informal hearing shall be commenced within 90 days before a hearing officer for the Labor Commissioner. Within 90 days of the conclusion of the hearing, the hearing officer shall issue a written decision. The decision shall consist of a statement of findings, conclusions of law, and an order. This decision shall be served on all parties pursuant to Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure by first-class mail at the last known address of the party on file with the Labor Commissioner. Any amount found due by the Labor Commissioner as a result of a hearing shall become due and payable 45 days after the written decision and order have been mailed to the person who requested the hearing. The Labor Commissioner shall adopt regulations setting forth procedures for hearings under this
 subdivision.

(d) (1) A person issued a citation pursuant to this section may obtain review of the written decision and order of the Labor Commissioner by filing a petition for a writ of mandate to the appropriate superior court pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure within 45 days after service of the Labor Commissioner’s decision.

(2) As a condition to filing a petition for a writ of mandate, the petitioner seeking the writ shall first post a bond with the Labor Commissioner equal to the total amount of any penalties, lost wages and interest thereon, liquidated damages, and any other monetary relief that are due and owing as determined pursuant to subdivision (c). The bond shall be issued by a surety duly authorized to do business
 in this state and shall be issued in favor of the employee or employees who suffered the violation or violations.

(3) If no petition for writ of mandate is filed within 45 days after service of the decision, the order shall become final. If it is claimed in a petition for writ of mandate that the findings are not supported by the evidence, abuse of discretion is established if the court determines that the findings are not supported by substantial evidence in the light of the whole record.

(4) If the bond is not filed pursuant to paragraph (2), or if no petition for writ of mandate is filed pursuant to paragraph (1), or if the petition is dismissed or withdrawn without entry of judgment, a certified copy of the written decision and order may be entered by the Labor Commissioner
 in the office of the clerk of the superior court in any county in which the person assessed has property or in which the person assessed has or had a place of business. The clerk, immediately upon the filing, shall enter judgment for the state against the person assessed in the total monetary amount shown on the certified order. The Labor Commissioner may also file a petition in superior court for judicial enforcement of any injunctive and other nonmonetary relief determined by the Labor Commissioner or their designee. After filing the petition, the Labor Commissioner may file an application for an order to show cause and serve it upon the respondent. Within 60 days of the date the Labor Commissioner filed the order to show cause, the court shall hold a hearing and, absent a showing of an abuse of discretion, shall issue an order for the injunctive and other nonmonetary relief.

(5) If the employer fails to pay the amount of penalties, lost wages and interest thereon, and liquidated damages owed within 10 days of the entry of judgment, dismissal, or withdrawal of writ, or the execution of a settlement agreement, a portion of the undertaking, described in paragraph (2), equal to the amount owed, or the entire undertaking if the amount owed exceeds the undertaking, shall be forfeited to the Labor Commissioner for appropriate distribution.

(e) In addition to any other appropriate relief, an employer who willfully refuses to comply with a final order pursuant to this section to hire, promote, or otherwise restore an employee or former employee who has been determined to be eligible for relief, or who refuses to comply with an order to post a notice to employees
 or otherwise cease and desist from the violation, in addition to any other penalties available, shall be subject to a penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each day the employer continues to be in noncompliance with the order, up to a maximum of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000). Any penalty pursuant to this subdivision shall be paid to the affected employee.

(f) The procedure for assessing, contesting, and enforcing the penalties pursuant to subdivision (e) shall be the same procedures set forth in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive.

(g) A judgment entered pursuant to this section shall bear the same rate of interest and shall have the same effect as other judgments and be given the same preference allowed by the law on other judgments rendered for claims for taxes.
 The clerk shall make no charge for the service provided by this section to be performed by them.

(h) The provisions contained in subdivisions (b), (c), (d), (e), and (g) that pertain to enforcement of the citation, enforcement of the written decision and order, interest accrual, and to the bond posting, shall apply to all existing citations issued pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (e) at the time of enactment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 721, Sec. 1.   (SB 229)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

98.75.

The Labor Commissioner shall submit a report to the Legislature by February 15, 1987, and annually thereafter by February 15, providing the following information with respect to discrimination complaints for the previous calendar year:

(a) The number of complaints filed pursuant to Section 98.7 or 1197.5, grouped according to the section of the Labor Code allegedly violated.

(b) The number of determinations issued, the number of investigative hearings held, the number of complaints dismissed, and the number of complaints found to be valid, grouped by the year in which the complaints were filed.

(c) The number of cases in which the respondent complied with the Labor Commissioner’s order to remedy unlawful discrimination, the number of these orders with which respondents failed to comply, the number of court actions brought by the Labor Commissioner to remedy unlawful discrimination, and the results of those court actions. If the Labor Commissioner did not bring an action in court within 10 days against a respondent who failed to comply with his or her order, the report shall specify the reasons for not bringing action in court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1479, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

98.8.

The Labor Commissioner shall promulgate all regulations and rules of practice and procedure necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

98.9.

Upon a finding by the Labor Commissioner that a willful or deliberate violation of any of the provisions of the Labor Code, within the jurisdiction of the Labor Commissioner, has been committed by a person licensed as a contractor pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, in the course of such licensed activity, the Labor Commissioner shall immediately, upon expiration of the period for review specified in Section 98.2, or other applicable section, deliver a certified copy of the finding of the violation to the registrar of the Contractors’ State License Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1247.)
-------------------------------------------

98.10.

(a) On or before June 1, 2017, the Labor Commissioner shall develop a model notice pertaining to workplace rights and wage and hour laws for employees of establishments licensed under Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 7301) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code. The model posting notice shall be developed using plain language, and in all languages listed in subdivision (c), and be accessible on the Labor Commissioner’s Internet Web site so that it is reasonably accessible to an establishment that must comply with Section 7353.4 of the Business
 and Professions Code.

(b) The model notice shall include information, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Misclassification of an employee as an independent contractor.

(2) Wage and hour laws, including, but not limited to, minimum wage, overtime compensation, meal periods, and rest periods.

(3) Tip or gratuity distribution.

(4) How to report violations of the law.

(5) Business expense reimbursement.

(6) Protection from retaliation.

(c) The model notice shall include full text translations in Spanish, Vietnamese, and Korean.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 357, Sec. 2.   (AB 2437)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

98.11.

The Labor Commissioner shall develop a model list of employees’ rights and responsibilities under the whistleblower laws that complies with the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 1102.8. The model list shall be accessible on the Labor Commissioner’s internet website so that it is reasonably accessible to an employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 105, Sec. 1.   (AB 2299)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

99.

The division may file preferred claims, mechanics’ liens, and other liens of employees in the name of the Labor Commissioner, his deputy or representative or in the names of the employees, whenever the facts have been investigated and found to support the claims. A statement that such facts have been found shall be alleged in the preferred claim or lien if it is filed in the name of the Labor Commissioner, his deputy or representative.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

100.

The division may join various claimants in one preferred claim or lien as well as list them with the data regarding their claims in an exhibit and join them, in case of suit, in one cause of action in cases where no valid reason exists for making separate causes of action for each individual employee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

100.5.

Preferred claims for work performed or personal services rendered are provided for in Sections 1204, 1205, 1206, 1207, and 1208 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and Part 9 (commencing with Section 11400) of Division 7 of the Probate Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1199, Sec. 22.5.   Operative July 1, 1989, by Sec. 119 of Ch. 1199.)
-------------------------------------------

101.

No court costs of any nature shall be payable by the division, in any civil action to which the division is a party. Any sheriff or marshal requested by the Labor Commissioner or a deputy or representative of the Labor Commissioner shall serve the summons in the action upon any person within the jurisdiction of the sheriff or marshal or levy under a writ of attachment or execution in the action upon the property of any defendant without cost to the division except for keeper’s fees, service fees, and storage charges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 103.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

101.5.

No fees shall be payable for the filing or recording of any document or paper in the performance of any official service by the Labor Commissioner. The amount ordinarily charged for such filing or recording shall be made a part of any judgment recovered by the Labor Commissioner and shall be paid by the Labor Commissioner if sufficient money is collected over and above the wages, penalties, or demands actually due the claimants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

102.

The sheriff or marshal shall specify when the summons or process is returned, what costs he or she would ordinarily have been entitled to for such service, and those costs and the other regular court costs that would have accrued if the action was not by the Labor Commissioner shall be made a part of any judgment recovered by the Labor Commissioner and shall be paid by the Labor Commissioner if sufficient money is collected over and above the wages, penalties, or demands actually due the claimants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 104.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

103.

The Labor Commissioner shall, to the extent provided for by any reciprocal agreement entered into pursuant to Section 64, or by the laws of any other state, maintain actions in the courts of the other state for the collection of the claims for wages, judgments, and other demands and may assign the claims, judgments, and demands to the labor department or agency of the other state for collection to the extent that they may be permitted or provided for by the laws of that state or by reciprocal agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 98.)
-------------------------------------------

104.

The Labor Commissioner shall, upon the written request of the labor department or other corresponding agency of any other state or of any person, board, officer or commission of such state authorized to act for and on behalf of such labor department or corresponding agency, maintain actions in the courts of this state upon assigned claims for wages, judgments and demands arising in such other state in the same manner and to the same extent that such actions by the Labor Commissioner are authorized when arising in this state; provided, however, that such actions may be commenced and maintained only in those cases where such other state by appropriate legislation or by reciprocal agreement extends a like comity to cases arising in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

105.

(a) The Labor Commissioner shall provide qualified bilingual persons in public contact positions or as interpreters to assist those in such positions to provide information and services in the language of a limited- or non-English-speaking person, with the primary effort being exerted towards the largest segments of the non-English-speaking persons in this state.

(b) The Labor Commissioner shall provide that an interpreter be present at all hearings and interviews where appropriate.

(c) The Labor Commissioner shall prepare and distribute to the public, through its local offices, materials explaining services available in non-English languages, as well as in English. In addition, the commissioner shall prepare and use written materials in non-English languages as well as in English for use by local offices if the local office serves a substantial number of non-English-speaking people, as defined in Section 7296.2 of the Government Code. The commissioner shall prepare and use such complaint processing forms and form letters in the language of non-English speaking people as the commissioner deems necessary and appropriate for the filing, investigation, and resolution of wage claims, giving due consideration to the rights and obligations of all parties. The commissioner may, from time to time, at his or her discretion, eliminate, modify, amend, or add to the complaint processing forms and form letters which are the subject of bilingual or multilingual treatment or application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1089, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

106.

(a) The Labor Commissioner may authorize an employee of any of the agencies that participate in the Joint Enforcement Strike Force on the Underground Economy, as defined in Section 329 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, to issue citations pursuant to Sections 226.4 and 1022 and issue and serve a penalty assessment order pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 3722.

(b) No employees shall issue citations or penalty assessment orders pursuant to this section unless they have been specifically designated, authorized, and trained by the Labor Commissioner for this purpose. Appeals of all citations or penalty assessment orders shall follow the procedures prescribed in Section 226.5, 1023, or 3725, whichever is applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 685, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

107.

(a) The enforcement of Section 14110.65 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is vested with the State Department of Health Services.

(b) Any claim made under Section 14110.65 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall not constitute a wage claim as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 96, and shall not be subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 898, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.3. Discrimination and Harassment Prevention in the Construction Industry [107.5. - 107.5.]

107.5.

(a) The Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall develop recommendations for an industry-specific harassment and discrimination prevention policy and training standard for use by employers in the construction industry. For purposes of this subdivision, “in the construction industry” means performing work associated with construction, including work involving alteration, demolition, building, excavation, renovation, remodeling, maintenance, improvement, repair work, and any other work as described by Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code. The training standard shall focus on preventing harassment and discrimination in the construction industry on the basis of sex, race, and national origin, in addition to the other categories protected under Section 12940 of the
 Government Code.

(b) To assist in developing this standard, the Director of Industrial Relations shall convene an advisory committee to recommend minimum standards for a harassment and discrimination prevention policy and training program specific to the construction industry. The advisory committee shall be composed of representatives from recognized or certified collective bargaining agents that represent construction workers, construction industry employers or employer associations, labor-management groups in the construction industry, nonprofit organizations that represent women in the construction industry, and other related subject matter experts, and shall also include representatives of the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement, the Division of Occupational Safety and Health, and the
 Civil Rights Department. The director shall convene the advisory committee no later than March 1, 2020. The advisory committee shall consider the requirements of Section 12950.1 of the Government Code when developing the recommended minimum standard.

(c) The Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall provide a report to the Legislature by no later than January 1, 2021, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, with recommendations for an industry-specific harassment and discrimination prevention policy and training standard for use by employers in the construction industry and recommendations for legislation that would need to be enacted to implement such a standard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 48, Sec. 58.   (SB 189)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.4. Women in Construction Priority Unit [107.7. - 107.7.2.]

107.7.

For purposes of this chapter, all of the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Department” means the Department of Industrial Relations.

(b) “Director” means the Director of Industrial Relations.

(c) “Unit” means the Women in Construction Priority Unit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 7.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

107.7.1.

(a) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the department shall establish a Women in Construction Priority Unit, overseen by the director, to coordinate and help ensure collaboration across the department’s divisions, and maximize state and federal funding to support women and nonbinary individuals in the construction workforce.

(b) (1) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, to assist with the establishment of the unit, the director shall, by July 1, 2023, convene an advisory committee to make recommendations to advance the unit’s objectives.

(2) The advisory committee shall be composed of representatives from recognized or certified collective
 bargaining agents who represent construction workers, construction industry employers or employer associations, labor-management groups in the construction industry, nonprofit organizations that represent women in the construction industry, and other related subject matter experts. The advisory committee shall also include representatives of the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement, the Division of Occupational Safety and Health, and the Department of Fair Employment and Housing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 7.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

107.7.2.

The unit shall do all of the following:

(a) Assist and provide resources to women and nonbinary individuals, including, but not limited to, apprentices and journeypersons in the construction industry, including developing materials for employers and unions to promote the recruitment and retention of women and nonbinary individuals in construction, maintaining an internet website listing workers’ rights, developing training materials specific to women and nonbinary individuals to navigate health and safety and wage and hour laws, and leadership training to increase the upward mobility of women and nonbinary individuals in construction careers.

(b) Provide resources for employers and project owners, including public
 agencies, to improve construction worksite culture, address barriers to employment, develop training and materials for workforce pipeline professionals specific to women and nonbinary individuals in construction, and interagency training.

(c) Upon request by a state agency and approval by the Secretary of Labor and Workforce Development, establish interagency agreements that shall include the requirements in subdivisions (a) and (b) to promote the recruitment and retention of women and nonbinary individuals in construction.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 3100, preapprenticeship programs shall be eligible for resources provided under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 196, Sec. 17.   (SB 143)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.5. Electrician Certification [108. - 108.5.]

108.

(a) The Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall do all of the following:

(1) Maintain minimum standards for the competency and training of electricians through a system of testing and certification.

(2) Maintain an advisory committee and panels as necessary to carry out the functions under this section. There shall be contractor representation from both joint apprenticeship programs and unilateral nonunion programs in the electrical contracting industry.

(3) Establish and collect fees necessary to implement this section.

(4) Carry out the responsibilities of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards that are specified in Subchapter 4 (commencing with Section 290) of Chapter 2 of Division 1 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations. The Labor Commissioner may amend or repeal existing regulations or adopt new regulations as necessary to enforce this section. Pending amendments to conform to this section, any reference within the Subchapter 4 regulations to the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards is deemed a reference to the Labor Commissioner, and references to prior statutory sections are deemed to refer to current statutory language as follows:

(A) References to former Section 3099 refer to current Section 108.

(B) References to former Section 3099.2 refer to current Section 108.2.

(C) References to former Section 3099.3 refer to current Section 108.3.

(D) References to former Section 3099.4 refer to current Section 108.4.

(E) References to former Section 3099.5 refer to current Section 108.5.
